Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1386.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3722(c) and the definition of "urban municipality" in subsection (g) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3722. Off-road vehicles in urban municipalities.* * *(c) Penalty.--Except as provided in subsection (d), an individual who violates subsection (a) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction:(1) For a first offense, be sentenced to pay a fine of [not less than $50 nor more than] $200 and costs of prosecution and, in default of the payment of the fine or costs, be imprisoned for not more than 10 days.1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) For a subsequent offense, be sentenced to pay a fine of [not less than $100 nor more than] $300 and costs of prosecution and, in default of the payment of the fine or costs, be imprisoned for not more than 30 days.* * *(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Urban municipality." [A city of the first class, second class, second class A or third class.] The term includes the following:(1) A city of the first class.(2) A county of the second class, second class A or third class.(3) A city of the second class, second class A or third class.Section 2. Section 3733(a) of Title 75 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3733. Fleeing or attempting to elude police officer.(a) Offense defined.--Any driver of a motor vehicle, an all-terrain vehicle or a dirt bike who willfully fails or refuses to bring his vehicle to a stop, or who otherwise flees or attempts to elude a pursuing police officer, when given a visual and audible signal to bring the vehicle, all-terrain vehicle or dirt bike to a stop, commits an offense as graded in subsection (a.2).* * *(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20260SB1386PN1828 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"All-terrain vehicle." As defined under section 3722(g) (relating to off-road vehicles in urban municipalities)."Dirt bike." As defined under section 3722(g).Section 3. Section 3736 of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 3736. Reckless driving.(a) General rule.--Any person who drives any vehicle in willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of reckless driving.(a.1) All-terrain vehicle and dirt bike.--(1) Any person who drives an all-terrain vehicle or dirt bike in an urban municipality in a willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of reckless driving.(2) If at least three or more persons are driving all-terrain vehicles or dirt bikes in an urban municipality in a willful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property, the persons are guilty of reckless driving.(b) Penalty.--(1) Any person who violates [this section] subsection (a) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $200.(2) Any person who violates subsection (a.1) commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction:(i) For a first offense, be sentenced to pay a fine of $200 and costs of the prosecution and, in default of the payment of the fine or costs, be imprisoned for not more than 10 days.(ii) For a subsequent offense, be sentenced to pay a fine of $300 and costs of prosecution and, in default of 20260SB1386PN1828 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the payment of the fine or costs, be imprisoned for not more than 30 days.(3) Any person who violates subsection (a.1)(2) commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"All-terrain vehicle." As defined under section 3722(g) (relating to off-road vehicles in urban municipalities)."Dirt bike." As defined under section 3722(g)."Urban municipality." As defined under section 3722(g).Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1386PN1828 - 4 - 123456789101112